Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department  of Education by section 2 (3), chapter 449, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, to be distributed  as grants-in-aid, for program costs and
to purchase services, for youth development  programs, is increased by $2,500,000, for the
East Metro Outreach, Prevention and Intervention program.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Education by section 1 (1), chapter 449, Oregon  Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for operations, is  increased by $1,988,595, for curriculum
supplements related to the dangers of synthetic opioids.
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING AND CARE
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Early Learning and Care  by section 1 (2), chapter 448, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for Early Learning Programs, is increased
by $2,700,000, for relief nurseries.
HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING COMMISSION
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission, for the biennium ending June 30,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $4,000,000,  for distribution to the following in-
stitutions in the following amounts to be used for education and training to expand  the be-
havioral health workforce in Oregon, which  may include awarding stipends, fellowships,
scholarships or any  other type of tuition assistance to students; providing behavioral and
mental health services to individuals from underserved communities, including  individuals
who are veterans, homeless or living in rural environments;  partnering with community or-
ganizations and labor management partnerships to develop career  pathways; developing ed-
ucation and training programs; and any other method reasonably  necessary to expand access
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 1
to education and training in this state for the next generation of behavioral and mental
health practitioners:
(1) $666,667 to Eastern Oregon University.
(2) $666,667 to Oregon Institute of Technology.
(3) $1,333,332 to Portland State University.
(4) $666,667 to Southern Oregon University.
(5) $666,667 to Western Oregon University.
OREGON HEALTH AUTHORITY
SECTION 5.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1  (2), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Health Systems Division - Programs, is increased by
$2,055,976, for carrying  out the provisions of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2024 (Enrolled House
Bill 4002).
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 5 (2), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for Health  Services Division - Programs, is in-
creased by $1,064,016, for carrying out the provisions  of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2024 (En-
rolled House Bill 4002).
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (7), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is in-
creased by $3,675, for carrying out the provisions of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2024 (Enrolled
House Bill 4002).
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 5 (7), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for state assessments  and enterprise-wide costs,
is increased by $3,363, for carrying out the  provisions of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2024
(Enrolled House Bill 4002).
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (10), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the  biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon  Laws 2023,
collected or received by the  Oregon Health Authority, for shared administrative services, is
increased by $81,704, for carrying out  the provisions of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2024 (En-
rolled House Bill 4002).
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (2), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Health Systems Division - Programs, is  increased by
$7,500,000, for distribution to Community Mental Health Programs for community restoration
services.
SECTION 11.
In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $9,825,000, for Health Systems Division - Programs, for dis-
tribution to Community Mental Health Programs to provide  deflection program coordination
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 2
and services as described under section 76, chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2024 (Enrolled House
Bill 4002).
SECTION 12. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of  $3,155,147, which shall be expended to provide the nonfederal
matching share required for costs of targeted case management services in the Nurse-Family
Partnership nurse home visiting services program.
SECTION 13.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (1), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Health Systems Division -Administration, is increased
by $750,000, for the System of Care Advisory Council to partner  with a national organization
specializing in resources addressing issues of drug-endangered children.
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section 1  (4), chapter 377, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for community corrections, is increased by $16,000,000.
OREGON CRIMINAL JUSTICE COMMISSION
SECTION 15. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Criminal Justice  Commission, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the  amount of $20,708,200, for deposit into the Oregon Behavioral
Health Deflection Program Account established by section 78, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2024
(Enrolled House Bill 4002).
SECTION 16. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$20,708,200 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Criminal  Justice Commission from the Oregon Behav-
ioral Health Deflection Program Account established in section 78, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws
2024 (Enrolled House Bill 4002), for making grants  to fund deflection programs through the
formula established in section 76 (6), chapter __, Oregon Laws 2024 (Enrolled House Bill 4002),
including grants in the amount of 50 percent of the expected formula amounts  due to the
following counties,  which must be distributed within 60 days of the effective date of this 2024
Act: Baker County, Benton County, Clackamas County,  Clatsop County, Columbia County,
Crook County,  Curry County, Deschutes County, Gilliam County, Grant County, Harney
County, Hood River County, Jackson County, Josephine County, Klamath  County, Lane
County, Malheur County, Marion County, Morrow County, Multnomah County,  Umatilla
County, Wasco County and Washington County.
NOTE: Section 17 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 18. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Criminal Justice  Commission, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, for deposit into  the Oregon Jail-Based
Medications for Opioid Use Disorder Fund established  in section 87, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2024 (Enrolled House Bill 4002).
SECTION 19. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission by  section 1, chapter 378, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, is increased by  $1,840,092, for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2024 (Enrolled House Bill 4002).
SECTION 20. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$10,000,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission from the Oregon Jail-Based
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 3
Medications for Opioid Use Disorder Fund established  in section 87, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2024 (Enrolled House Bill 4002),  for making grants to cities and counties that operate
a local correctional facility and to federally  recognized tribes that operate a tribal
correctional facility.
SECTION 21. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  by section 1, chapter 378, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  is increased by $6,919,141, for specialty court
grants.
SECTION 22. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  by section 1, chapter 378, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, is decreased by $4,456,232, to fund shift specialty
court grants.
SECTION 23. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Criminal Justice  Commission, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,
out of  the General Fund, the amount of $4,000,000, for the restorative justice grant program.
SECTION 24. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission by  section 1, chapter 378, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  is increased by $1,000,000, for a public service
campaign and outreach.
SECTION 25. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Criminal Justice  Commission, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $500,000, for a jail reentry pilot program.
DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE
SECTION 26. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (7), chapter 382, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice, for  the General Counsel Division,
is increased by $92,166, for legal services to state agencies.
DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE
SECTION 27. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Department of State Police by section 1 (3), chapter 386, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Forensic Services  and Chief Medical Examiner, is in-
creased by $818,361, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2024 (Enrolled House Bill 4002).
SECTION 28.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (4), chapter 386, Oregon Laws  2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Administrative Services, Agency Support and Criminal
Justice Information Services, is increased by $791,543, for the purpose of carrying out  the
provisions of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2024 (Enrolled House Bill 4002).
JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
SECTION 29. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (2), chapter 380,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for operations, is increased by $2,959,966, for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2024 (Enrolled House Bill 4002).
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 4
SECTION 30. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (2), chapter 380,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, for operations, is increased by $9,696,843, for specialty  courts.
SECTION 31. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 380, Oregon Laws  2023, as the maximum limit
for payment of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Re-
ceipts and including reimbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described  in section 2, chapter 380, Oregon Laws 2023, collected
or received by the  Judicial Department, for operations, is decreased by $4,456,232, to fund
shift specialty court grants.
OREGON PUBLIC DEFENSE COMMISSION
SECTION 32. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (4), chapter 481,  Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30,  2025, for the Adult Trial Division, is increased by
$7,543,529, for the  purpose of carrying out the provisions of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2024
(Enrolled House Bill 4002).
SECTION 33. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (7), chapter 481, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Court Mandated Expenses,  is increased by
$3,000,000, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2024
(Enrolled House Bill 4002).
SECTION 34. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (6), chapter 481,  Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Preauthorized Expenses, is increased by
$1,647,542, for the  purpose of carrying out the provisions of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2024
(Enrolled House Bill 4002).
SECTION 35.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (10), chapter 481, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Special Programs, Contracts and Dis-
tributions Division, is  increased by $2,056,436, for the unrepresented defendant/persons crisis
and a misdemeanor training collaboration with law schools.
OREGON DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
SECTION 36.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there are appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for provision of grants to  the fol-
lowing entities for the following purposes:
(1) $600,000 to New Directions Northwest, Inc., to build a crisis receiving center  addition
to the Recovery Village Crisis Stabilization and Detox Center.
(2) $5,000,000 to Benton County Health Department Behavioral Health Division to relocate
Children and Family Services.
(3) $4,000,000 to Clackamas County for the construction of a crisis stabilization center.
(4) $500,000 to Clatsop Behavioral Healthcare to acquire detox and  substance use disorder
treatment residential beds.
(5) $400,000 to Coos Health and Wellness for the development of a sobering center.
(6) $525,000 to BestCare Treatment Services, Inc., to expand detox capacity in central
Oregon.
(7) $1,500,000 to  Deschutes County Community Mental Health Program to support the
Deschutes County Stabilization Center.
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 5
(8) $5,000,000 to Adapt Integrated Health Care to support the  construction of the Adapt
Recovery Campus.
(9) $500,000 to Addictions Recovery Center, Inc., for sobering center operations.
(10) $1,000,000 to Addictions Recovery Center, Inc., to support the Substance Use  Disor-
der Withdrawal Management Expansion project.
(11) $1,500,000 to BestCare Treatment Services, Inc., to develop culturally specific sub-
stance use disorder residential treatment capacity.
(12) $2,400,000 to Klamath Basin Behavioral Health  to support the construction of a res-
idential treatment facility with a crisis stabilization center.
(13) $2,500,000 to Transformations Wellness Center for the construction of a residential,
co-occurring, substance use disorder treatment facility with detox beds.
(14) $4,000,000 to Willamette Family, Inc., to  support the construction of the Willamette
Family Medical Detox and Resident Services facility.
(15) $3,500,000 to Lincoln County Health and Human Services Department to  support the
Lighthouse Village Apartments Mental Health Housing project.
(16) $5,750,000 to Lifeways, Inc., for the  Ontario Medical Plaza project to convert vacant
retail space into an integrated healthcare facility with supported housing units.
(17) $11,500,000 to Bridgeway Recovery  Services, Inc., for the development of the
Bridgeway Medical Center and substance use disorder treatment residential facilities.
(18) $10,000,000 to Multnomah County to support  the construction of a behavioral health
drop-off center.
(19) $4,000,000 to the  4th Dimension Recovery Center (4D Recovery) to support the ac-
quisition of a facility to provide adolescent substance  use disorder residential and outpatient
services.
(20) $4,000,000 to Cascade AIDS Project to purchase the  Prism Health facility located on
North Morris Street, Portland, Oregon.
(21) $333,000 to Wallowa Valley Center for Wellness to support  phase 2 of the Park Street
Transitional Housing project.
(22) $8,000,000 to Wasco  County to support the development of the Mid-Columbia Center
for Living Campus.
(23) $8,900,000 to Washington County Behavioral Health Division to support  the develop-
ment of the Center for Addictions Triage and Treatment project.
SECTION 37.
In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000,  for distribution to Portland Op-
portunities Industrialization Center for a peer-to-peer mentoring outreach program.
SECTION 38. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2025,  out of the General Fund, the amount of $150,000, for distribution to WomenFirst
Transition and Referral Center for the purpose of providing detox services.
LEGISLATIVE POLICY AND RESEARCH COMMITTEE
SECTION 39. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Legislative Policy and Research Committee by section 15, chapter 383, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, is increased by $400,340, for the purpose
of supporting the task forces under sections 16 and 18, chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2024 (En-
rolled House Bill 4002).
EMERGENCY BOARD
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 6
SECTION 40. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to  the Emergency Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $4,700,000, to be allocated  to the Oregon Health Authority for
payments to employers of behavioral health care providers, as described in section 20, chap-
ter ___, Oregon Laws  2024 (Enrolled House Bill 4002), following the approval by the Centers
for Medicare and Medicaid Services of  the use of Federal Medical Assistance matching funds
by the Oregon Health Authority for this purpose.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated under subsection (1) of this section  are not allo-
cated by the Emergency Board prior  to December 1, 2024, the moneys remaining on that date
become available  for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate
funds.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 41.
The unit captions  used in this 2024 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 42. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House February 29, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 1, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 7